District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.16

Dismissal of meritless claim, complaint, or request for investigation.

(a)

The Ethics Board may dismiss, at any stage of the proceedings, any claim, complaint, request for investigation, investigation, or portion of an investigation that the Ethics Board finds to be without merit.

(b)

The Ethics Board may require a person who made or caused to be made a claim, complaint, or request for investigation in bad faith and without merit to pay reasonable fees for time spent reviewing or investigating the claim, complaint, or requests for investigation.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 216, 59 DCR 1862
This section is referenced in § 1-1162.14.